cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/pl_rules
	_histor) y (ka++	y
	_histor) y (kom++	y
	_tetr)	y	(ka++	y
	_tetr)	y	(kom++	y

	_et) y (L01_ =y
	_kryt) y (L01_ =y
	_prakt) y (L01_ =y
	_klas) y (L01_ =y
	_mist) y (L01 =y
	_stat) y (L01_ =y
	@aet) y (L01_ =y
	@akt) y (L01_ =y
	@ald) y (L01_ =y
	@alt) y (L01_ =y
	@ant) y (L01_ =y
	@ast) y (L01_ =y
	@aut) y (L01_ =y
	@bat) y (L01_ =y
	@bot) y (L01_ =y
	@cet) y (L01_ =y
	@det) y (L01_ =y
	@eks) y (L01_ =y
	@ekt) y (L01_ =y
	@ent) y (L01_ =y
	@ept) y (L01_ =y
	@est) y (L01_ =y
	@etr) y (L01_ =y
	@eut) y (L01_ =y
	fiz) y (L01_ =y
	@for) y (L01_ =y
	@get) y (L01_ =y
	@gor) y (L01_ =y
	@het) y (L01_ =y
	@iat) y (L01_ =y
	@iot) y (L01_ =y
	@ipt) y (L01_ =y
	@ist) y (L01_ =y
	@ktr) y (L01_ =y
	@las) y (L01_ =y
	@let) y (L01_ =y
	@lit) y (L01_ =y
	@lod) y (L01_ =y
	@mat) y (L01_ =y
	@mer) y (L01_ =y
	@met) y (L01_ =y
	@net) y (L01_ =y
	@nez) y (L01_ =y
	@not) y (L01_ =y
	@oet) y (L01_ =y
	opt) y (L01_ =y
	@ord) y (L01_ =y
	@ost) y (L01_ =y
	@ptr) y (L01_ =y
	@rat) y (L01_ =y
	@ret) y (L01_ =y
	@rkt) y (L01_ =y
	@rot) y (L01_ =y
	@ryt) y (L01_ =y
	@tat) y (L01_ =y
	@ter) y (L01_ =y
	@tet) y (L01_ =y
	@tod) y (L01_ =y
	@tor) y (L01_ =y
	@ust) y (L01_ =y
	@yst) y (L01_ =y
	@zot) y (L01_ =y

	@ł)	y	(byśmy_	=y
	@ł)	y	(byście_	=y
	@ł)	y	(by_	=y

	eb)	y	(śmy_	=y
	eb)	y	(ście_	=y
	_ab)	y	(ście_	=y
	_ab)	y	(śmy_	=y
	@)	y	(łbym_	=y
	@)	y	(łbyś_	=y
	@)	y	(łby_	=y

.group	 z
		z		z
		z	(_	s
		z	(i	Z;
		zi	(A	Z;
	_)	zi	(p	Z;i
		zi	(m+	Z;i
	_)	zi	(C	z_i
	_nie)	zi	(C	z_i
		zi	(C	zi

	_)	z	(_c	s
	_)	z	(_f	s
	_)	z	(_h	s
	_)	z	(_k	s
	_)	z	(_p	s
	_)	z	(_s	s
	_)	z	(_t	s
	_)	z	(_mn	zE // 'z' should be written 'ze' before 'mn', but not always
	_)	z	(_	z

	mo)	zi	(ll	zi
	_ro)	z	(iC	z
	_)	zuri	(ch	tsuRy
	_)	zz	(a_	z_z
		zz	(ini_	ts
		zz	(inim_	ts
		zz	(inimi_	ts
		zz	(inich_	ts
		zz	(iniemu_	ts
		zz	(iniego_	ts
		zz	(oni_	ts
		zz	(onim_	ts
		zz	(onimi_	ts
		zz	(onich_	ts
		zz	(oniemu_	ts
		zz	(oniego_	ts
		zz	(ani_	ts
		zz	(anim_	ts
		zz	(animi_	ts
		zz	(anich_	ts
		zz	(aniemu_	ts
		zz	(aniego_	ts
		z	(ini_	ts
		z	(inim_	ts
		z	(inimi_	ts
		z	(inich_	ts
		z	(iniemu_	ts
		z	(iniego_	ts
		zz	(a_	ts
		zz	(ami_	ts
		zz	(ach_	ts
		zz	(ów_	ts
		zz	(y_	ts
		zz	(ę_	ts
		zz	(o_	ts
	_pi)	zz		ts
	_mA)	zz	(A	ts

.group	 ź
		ź		Z;
		ź	(_	S;

.group	 ż
		ż		Z
		ż	(_	S

.group	 th
	_e)	th	(anak	t
	_)	the	(_	dE
		th		s
		th	(ie_	s;
	_)	th		t
	_)	thank		fENk
		thew		fju

	_)	thunderbi (rd	fEndERbE

.group	dg
	_na)	dg		dg
	_po)	dg		dg
	_o)	dg		dg
	prze)	dg		dg
	_popo)	dg		dg
	_pona)	dg		dg
	_poo)	dg		dg
	_niena)	dg		dg
	_nieo)	dg		dg
	_niepo)	dg		dg
	_niepona)	dg	dg
	_niepopo)	dg	dg
	_niepoo)	dg	dg
		dge	(_	dZ
		dg		dZ
.group sh
	_ek)	sh	sx
	_dy)	sh	sx
	_fi)	sh	(armon	sx
		sh	S
		shire	SajER
.group ph
		ph	f

.group tz
		tz	(ł	tz
		tz		ts

.group	oe
	cj)	oe		OE
	j)	oe	(r	E
	lj)	oe		E
	s)	oe	(r	E

.group	 ü
		ü		i

.group	 ö
		ö		E

.group	 ä
		ä		E

.group	 ž
		ž		Z

.group	 č
		č		tS

.group	 š
		š		S

.group	 ř
		ř		Z

.group	 å
		å		O

.group	 æ
		æ		E

.group	 ø
		ø		E

.group	 ñ
		ñ	(A	n^;
		ñ		n^

.group	í
		í	(A	ij
		í		i

.group

		'a	(_S2	a
		'owi	(_S4	Ovi
		'em	(_S3	Em
		'u	(_S2	u
		'ego	(_S4	EgO
		'emu	(_S4	Emu

		$		dOlaR
